output.aff
SFX E Y 63
SFX E   at          am         at
SFX E   at          as         at
SFX E   at          a          at
SFX E   at          ame        at
SFX E   at          ate        at
SFX E   at          aju        at
SFX E   at          ajuc       at
SFX E   at          aj         at
SFX E   at          ajme       at
SFX E   at          ajte       at
SFX E   at          al         at
SFX E   at          ala        at
SFX E   at          alo        at
SFX E   at          ali        at
SFX E   bit         b          bit
SFX E   cit         c          cit
SFX E   dit         d          dit
SFX E   dit         dme        dit
SFX E   dit         dte        dit
SFX E   dzit        dz         dzit
SFX E   fit         f          fit
SFX E   git         g          git
SFX E   chit        ch         chit
SFX E   it          a          jit
SFX E   it          ac         jit
SFX E   jit         j          jit
SFX E   it          ia         [^j]it
SFX E   it          iac        [^j]it
SFX E   kit         k          kit
SFX E   lit         l          [aaaeeiioouuyy]lit
SFX E   lit         lme        [aaaeeiioouuyy]lit
SFX E   lit         lte        [aaaeeiioouuyy]lit
SFX E   it          i          [^aaaeeiioouuyy]lit
SFX E   it          ime        [^aaaeeiioouuyy]lit
SFX E   it          ite        [^aaaeeiioouuyy]lit
SFX E   mit         m          mit
SFX E   nit         n          nit
SFX E   nit         nme        nit
SFX E   nit         nte        nit
SFX E   pit         p          pit
SFX E   it          i          rit
SFX E   it          ime        rit
SFX E   it          ite        rit
SFX E   vit         v          vit
SFX E   sit         s          sit
SFX E   sit         s          sit
SFX E   tit         t          tit
SFX E   tit         tme        tit
SFX E   tit         tte        tit
SFX E   zit         z          zit
SFX E   zit         z          zit
SFX E   it          me         it
SFX E   it          te         it
SFX E   it          im         it
SFX E   it          is         it
SFX E   it          i          it
SFX E   it          ime        it
SFX E   it          ite        it
SFX E   it          ia         it
SFX E   t           l          it
SFX E   t           la         it
SFX E   t           lo         it
SFX E   t           li         it
