output.dic
balit/EN
behat/EN
blikat/EN
bratat/EN
brzdit/EN
buvinkat/EN
cenit/EN
crkat/EN
cupkat/EN
cadit/EN
cechrat/EN
cinit/EN
crpkat/EN
darit/EN
divit/EN
docenit/EN
dohasit/EN
dochovat/EN
dojit/EN
dokrivkat/EN
dolozit/EN
doobjednat/EN
doplnit/EN
dorantat/ENT
dosadat/EN
dostrelit/EN
dospatit/EN
dotkat/EN
dovarit/EN
dozvonit/EN
drobcit/EN
dupcit/EN
dvorit/EN
faklit/EN
fotit/EN
furmanit/E
habkat/EN
hajuskat/EN
hasit/EN
hladkat/EN
hmkat/EN
hodnotit/EN
hopkat/EN
hranicit/EN
hrkat/EN
huckat/EN
chlacholit/EN
chovat/EN
chvalorecit/EN
iskrit/EN
jajkat/EN
javit/EN
kajat/EN
klakat/EN
klipkat/EN
kolembat/EN
korit/EN
krivit/EN
kuceravit/EN
kutit/EN
kvicat/ENR
lahodit/EN
lazkat/EN
lezkat/EN
lopotit/EN
mackat/EN
maskrtit/EN
metat/EN
modlit/EN
mrastit/EN
mrzacit/EN
nabodat/EN
nacistit/EN
nadhodnotit/EN
nadrapit/EN
naduzit/EN
nahlodat/EN
nahradit/EN
nachovat/EN
nakopcit/EN
nakvapkat/EN
nalomit/EN
namokat/EN
naparit/EN
napojit/EN
narazit/EN
nasadit/EN
nasolit/EN
nastrazit/EN
naskrobit/EN
natekat/EN
navalit/EN
navyberat/EN
nechat/EN
nudit/EN
obehat/EN
objednat/EN
oblazit/EN
obnazit/EN
obrastat/EN
obstrihat/EN
obtocit/EN
ocicat/EN
odbavit/EN
odcupkat/EN
odfaklit/EN
odhodlat/EN
odjazdit/EN
odkukat/EN
odmastit/EN
odmykat/EN
odomykat/EN
odpelhat/EN
odpovedat/EN
odpruzit/EN
odrocit/EN
odstrasit/EN
odtajit/EN
odvarit/EN
odvozit/EN
odznacit/E
oholit/EN
ochladit/EN
oklebetit/EN
omarit/EN
onacit/EN
opekat/EN
oplodnit/EN
opustit/EN
oslepit/EN
ospravedlnit/EN
osychat/EN
otapit/EN
otrocit/EN
ovesit/EN
ozelenit/EN
padat/EN
parit/EN
perlit/EN
plachtit/EN
plekat/EN
pobalit/EN
pocikat/EN
podberat/EN
podhodit/EN
podkusit/EN
podoberat/EN
podrastat/EN
podstrelit/EN
poharkat/EN
pohmkat/EN
pohrat/EN
pochovat/EN
poistit/EN
poklonit/EN
pokreslit/EN
pokyvkat/EN
polepit/EN
poltit/EN
pomechrit/EN
pomotat/ENT
ponemcit/EN
popichat/EN
popreberat/EN
popucit/EN
porazit/EN
porucit/EN
poskackat/EN
posotit/EN
postenat/EN
postrelit/EN
poseptat/ENT
pospinit/EN
potahat/EN
potopit/EN
poturcit/EN
povalit/EN
povlazit/EN
povyberat/EN
pozametat/EN
pozdravit/EN
pozenit/EN
prazit/EN
precedit/EN
predbiehat/EN
predchladit/EN
predohrat/EN
predtlacit/EN
prehladit/EN
prehresit/EN
prekladat/EN
prekrvit/EN
preladit/EN
premeskat/EN
prepadat/EN
prepotit/EN
prerodit/EN
presladit/EN
prestrojit/EN
preskvarit/EN
pretlkat/ENX
preverit/EN
prezradit/EN
pribit/EN
priclenit/EN
prihladit/EN
prichodit/EN
prikrcit/EN
prilepsit/EN
pripazit/EN
pripojit/EN
prirobit/EN
prisolit/EN
priskvarit/EN
pritlacit/EN
privodit/EN
prizivit/EN
pufkat/EN
rachotit/EN
repentit/EN
ronit/EN
rozborit/EN
rozcertit/EN
rozdrvit/EN
rozhodit/EN
rozhresit/EN
rozjasat/EN
rozkrocit/EN
rozlepit/EN
rozmnozit/EN
roznozit/EN
rozpadat/EN
rozplasit/EN
rozpredat/EN
rozrastat/EN
rozskocit/EN
rozskerit/EN
rozsvitorit/EN
roztratit/EN
rozvalkat/EN
rozvodnit/EN
rozzehnat/EN
samopasit/EN
sedkat/EN
schodit/EN
silit/EN
sklopit/EN
skreslit/EN
skujnit/EN
slepit/EN
smilnit/EN
snorit/EN
spapkat/EN
sperlit/EN
splnit/EN
spochabit/EN
sporit/EN
spredmetnit/EN
sprisahat/EN
sputnat/EN
stazit/EN
sterigat/EN
stonkat/EN
stratit/EN
strmit/EN
studenit/EN
susedit/EN
svrkat/EN
sepletit/EN
skerit/EN
skrtit/EN
spendlit/EN
sramotit/EN
strachat/EN
stvrtit/EN
sveholit/EN
tapkat/EN
tazkat/EN
tesit/EN
tloskat/EN
tratit/EN
tukat/EN
tykat/EN
ucit/EN
udobrit/EN
uhorit/EN
uchytit/EN
uklonit/EN
ulahodit/EN
ulutostnit/EN
unavit/EN
upchat/EN
uprazit/EN
urodit/EN
uskorit/EN
uspokojit/EN
uskodit/EN
uteplit/EN
utopit/EN
uvalit/EN
uverit/EN
uzhovorit/EN
varit/EN
vencit/EN
vhodit/EN
vkvapkat/EN
vnikat/EN
vopchat/EN
vrastit/EN
vsotit/EN
vtlacit/EN
vybocit/EN
vycvicit/EN
vyckat/EN
vydojit/EN
vyfarbit/EN
vyholit/EN
vyhrotit/EN
vychytat/EN
vykadit/EN
vykoktat/ENT
vykreslit/EN
vykydat/EN
vylestit/EN
vymedzit/EN
vymrstit/EN
vynasobit/EN
vyocit/EN
vyplasit/EN
vypojit/EN
vyprosit/EN
vyrastat/EN
vyrusit/EN
vyslobodit/EN
vystacit/EN
vysustruzit/EN
vyskolit/EN
vytahat/EN
vytlacit/EN
vytrhat/EN
vyvalit/EN
vyvodit/EN
vyzdobit/EN
vyzit/ENW
vzlykat/EN
zababusit/EN
zablabotat/ENT
zaburinit/EN
zacmukat/EN
zacervenit/EN
zadebnit/EN
zadupotat/ENT
zagagotat/ENT
zahatit/EN
zahmlit/EN
zahrkat/EN
zachechotat/ENT
zachytit/EN
zajasat/EN
zaklepkat/EN
zakolembat/EN
zakrochkat/EN
zakvackat/EN
zalesnit/EN
zamachlit/EN
zamestnat/EN
zamokat/EN
zamykat/EN
zaoberat/EN
zapadat/EN
zapekat/EN
zaplavit/EN
zapotit/EN
zapricinit/EN
zarachotit/EN
zarobit/EN
zasadat/EN
zaslzit/EN
zasoplit/EN
zastrihat/EN
zasepotat/ENT
zaskrobit/EN
zastopkat/EN
zasuskat/ENT
zatavit/EN
zatmit/EN
zatvorit/EN
zavarit/EN
zavlazit/EN
zavzlykat/EN
zazverit/EN
zbalit/EN
zbrojit/EN
zdokonalit/EN
zdrazit/EN
zdvojnasobit/EN
zhnisat/EN
zhovadit/EN
zhutnit/EN
zjasit/EN
zjezit/EN
zlepit/EN
zmakcit/EN
zmestit/EN
zmorit/EN
zmrvit/EN
znasilnit/EN
znechutit/EN
zneskodnit/EN
znozit/EN
zocit/EN
zosekat/EN
zostrelit/EN
zoskrtat/EN
zotavit/EN
zradit/EN
zrosit/EN
zutekat/EN
zvecnit/EN
zvetrat/EN
zvlnit/EN
zvrastit/EN
zelat/EN
zivotnit/EN
